Mississippi, session 2026, SB2576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 73-21-151, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-151.  Sections 73-21-151 through * * * 73‑21‑163 73-21-169 shall be known as the "Pharmacy Benefit Prompt Pay Act." SECTION 2.  Section 73-21-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-153.  For purposes of Sections 73-21-151 through * * * 73‑21‑163 73-21-169, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Board" means the * * * State Mississippi Board of Pharmacy. (b)  "Clean claim" means a completed billing instrument, paper or electronic, received by a pharmacy benefit manager from a pharmacist or pharmacies or the insured, which is accepted and payment remittance advice is provided by the pharmacy benefit manager.  A clean claim includes resubmitted claims with previously identified deficiencies corrected. ( * * *bc)  "Commissioner" means the Mississippi Commissioner of Insurance. ( * * *cd)  "Day" means a calendar day, unless otherwise defined or limited. ( * * *de)  "Electronic claim" means the transmission of data for purposes of payment of covered prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services in an electronic data format specified by a pharmacy benefit manager and approved by the department. ( * * *ef)  "Electronic adjudication" means the process of electronically receiving * * *, and reviewing an electronic claim and either accepting and providing payment remittance advice for the electronic claim or rejecting * * * an the electronic claim. ( * * *fg)  "Enrollee" means an individual who has been enrolled in a pharmacy benefit management plan or health insurance plan. ( * * *gh)  "Health insurance plan" means benefits consisting of prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services provided directly, through insurance or reimbursement, or otherwise and including items and services paid for as prescription drugs, other products and supplies, and pharmacist services under any hospital or medical service policy or certificate, hospital or medical service plan contract, preferred provider organization agreement, or health maintenance organization contract offered by a health insurance issuer. (i)  "Network pharmacy" means a pharmacy licensed by the board and provides pharmacy services to Mississippi consumers and has a contract with a pharmacy benefit manager to provide covered drugs at a negotiated reimbursement rate. (j)  "Payment remittance advice" means the claim detail that the pharmacy receives when successfully processing an electronic or paper claim.  The claim detail shall contain, but is not limited to: (i)  The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager will reimburse for product ingredient; (ii)  The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager will reimburse for product dispensing fee; and (iii)  The amount that the pharmacy benefit manager dictates the patient must pay. (k)  "Pharmacist * * *," "pharmacist services" and "pharmacy" * * * or "pharmacies" shall have the same definitions as provided in Section 73-21-73. ( * * *hl)  "Pharmacy benefit manager" * * * shall have the same definition as provided in Section 73‑21‑179 means an entity that provides pharmacy benefit management services. * * *  However, through June 30, 2014, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include an insurance company that provides an integrated health benefit plan and that does not separately contract for pharmacy benefit management services.  From and after July 1, 2014, The term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include: (i)  An insurance company unless the insurance company is providing services as a pharmacy benefit manager * * * as defined in Section 73‑21‑179, in which case the insurance company shall be subject to Sections 73-21-151 through * * * 73‑21‑159 73-21-169 only for those pharmacy benefit manager services * * *.  In addition, the term "pharmacy benefit manager" shall not include the pharmacy benefit manager of the Mississippi State and School Employees Health Insurance Plan or; and (ii)  The Mississippi Division of Medicaid or its contractors when performing pharmacy benefit manager services for the Division of Medicaid. ( * * *im)  "Pharmacy benefit manager affiliate" means * * * a pharmacy or pharmacist an entity that directly or indirectly * * *, through one or more intermediaries, owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with a pharmacy benefit manager. ( * * *jn)  "Pharmacy benefit management plan" * * * shall have the same definition as provided in Section 73‑21‑179 means an arrangement for the delivery of pharmacist's services in which a pharmacy benefit manager undertakes to administer the payment or reimbursement of any of the costs of pharmacist's services, drugs or devices. * * *  (k) "Pharmacist," "pharmacist services" and "pharmacy" or "pharmacies" shall have the same definitions as provided in Section 73‑21‑73. (o)  "Pharmacy benefit management services" shall include, but is not limited to, the following services, which may be provided either directly or through outsourcing or contracts: (i)  Adjudicate drug claims or any portion of the transaction. (ii)  Contract with retail and mail pharmacy networks. (iii)  Establish payment levels for pharmacies. (iv)  Develop formulary or drug lists of covered therapies. (v)  Provide benefit design consultation. (vi)  Manage cost and utilization trends. (vii)  Contract for manufacturer rebates. (viii)  Provide fee-based clinical services to improve member care. (ix)  Third-party administration. (p) "Pharmacist services" means products, goods and services, or any combination of products, goods and services, provided as part of the practice of pharmacy. (q)  "Pharmacy services administrative organization" or "PSAO" means any entity that contracts with a pharmacy or pharmacist to assist with third-party interactions and that may provide a variety of other administrative services, including, but not limited to, contracting with pharmacy benefit managers on behalf of pharmacies and providing pharmacies with credentialing, billing, auditing, general business and analytic support.  A covered entity as defined in 42 USC Section 256b, including its pharmacy or the transactions related to the 340B drug discount program of any pharmacy contracted with the participating covered entity to dispense drugs purchased through the 340B drug discount program, shall not be considered to be a pharmacy services administrative organization. ( * * *mr)  "Plan sponsors" means the employers, insurance companies, unions and health maintenance organizations that contract, either directly or indirectly, with a pharmacy benefit manager for delivery of prescription drugs and/or services. (s) "Proprietary information" means information on pricing, costs, revenue, taxes, market share, negotiating strategies, customers and personnel that is held by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO and used for its business purposes. (t) "Rebate" means any and all payments and price concessions that accrue to a pharmacy benefit manager or its plan sponsor client, directly or indirectly, including through an affiliate, subsidiary, third party or intermediary, including off-shore group purchasing organizations, from a pharmaceutical manufacturer, its affiliate, subsidiary, third party or intermediary, including, but not limited to, payments, discounts, administration fees, credits, incentives or penalties associated directly or indirectly in any way with claims administered on behalf of a plan sponsor. (u)  "Spread pricing" means any amount charged or claimed by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO in excess of the ingredient cost for a dispensed prescription drug plus dispensing fee paid directly or indirectly to any pharmacy, pharmacist or other provider on behalf of the health benefit plan, less a pharmacy benefit management or PSAO fee. ( * * *lv)  "Uniform claim form" means a form prescribed by rule by the * * * State Board of Pharmacy board; however, for purposes of Sections 73-21-151 through * * * 73‑21‑159 73-21-169, the board shall adopt the same definition or rule where the State Department of Insurance has adopted a rule covering the same type of claim.  The board may modify the terminology of the rule and form when necessary to comply with the provisions of Sections 73-21-151 through * * * 73‑21‑159 73-21-169. (w)  "Wholesale acquisition cost" means the wholesale acquisition cost of the drug as defined in 42 USC§ 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B). SECTION 3.  Section 73-21-155, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-155.  (1) Reimbursement under a contract to a pharmacist or pharmacy for prescription drugs and other products and supplies that is calculated according to a formula that uses Medi-Pan, Gold Standard or a nationally recognized reference that has been approved by the board in the pricing calculation shall use the most current reference price or amount in the actual or constructive possession of the pharmacy benefit manager, its agent, or any other party responsible for reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies on the date of electronic adjudication or on the date of service shown on the nonelectronic claim. (2)  Pharmacy benefit managers, their agents and other parties responsible for reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies shall be required to update the nationally recognized reference prices or amounts used for calculation of reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies no less than every three (3) business days. (3)  (a)  All benefits payable under a pharmacy benefit management plan shall be paid within seven (7) days after receipt of due written proof a clean claim where claims are submitted electronically, and shall be paid within thirty-five (35) days after receipt of due written proof of a clean claim where claims are submitted in paper format.  Benefits due under the plan and claims are overdue if not paid within seven (7) days or thirty-five (35) days, whichever is applicable, after the pharmacy benefit manager receives a clean claim containing necessary information essential for the pharmacy benefit manager to administer preexisting condition, coordination of benefits and subrogation provisions under the plan sponsor's health insurance plan.  A "clean claim" means a * * * a claim received by any pharmacy benefit manager for adjudication and which requires no further information, adjustment or alteration by the pharmacist or pharmacies or the insured in order to be processed and paid by the pharmacy benefit manager.  A claim is clean if it has no defect or impropriety, including any lack of substantiating documentation, or particular circumstance requiring special treatment that prevents timely payment from being made on the claim under this subsection. completed billing instrument, paper or electronic, received by a pharmacy benefit manager from a pharmacist or pharmacies or the insured, which is accepted and payment remittance advice is provided by the pharmacy benefit manager.  A clean claim includes resubmitted claims with previously identified deficiencies corrected. (b)  A clean claim does not include any of the following: (i)  A duplicate claim, which means an original claim and its duplicate when the duplicate is filed within thirty (30) days of the original claim; (ii)  Claims which are submitted fraudulently or that are based upon material misrepresentations; (iii)  Claims that require information essential for the pharmacy benefit manager to administer preexisting condition, coordination of benefits or subrogation provisions under the plan sponsor's health insurance plan; or (iv)  Claims submitted by a pharmacist or pharmacy more than thirty (30) days after the date of service; if the pharmacist or pharmacy does not submit the claim on behalf of the insured, then a claim is not clean when submitted more than thirty (30) days after the date of billing by the pharmacist or pharmacy to the insured. (c)  Not later than seven (7) days after the date the pharmacy benefit manager actually receives an electronic claim, the pharmacy benefit manager shall pay the appropriate benefit in full, or any portion of the claim that is clean, and notify the pharmacist or pharmacy (where the claim is owed to the pharmacist or pharmacy) of the reasons why the claim or portion thereof is not clean and will not be paid and what substantiating documentation and information is required to adjudicate the claim as clean.  Not later than thirty-five (35) days after the date the pharmacy benefit manager actually receives a paper claim, the pharmacy benefit manager shall pay the appropriate benefit in full, or any portion of the claim that is clean, and notify the pharmacist or pharmacy (where the claim is owed to the pharmacist or pharmacy) of the reasons why the claim or portion thereof is not clean and will not be paid and what substantiating documentation and information is required to adjudicate the claim as clean.  Any claim or portion thereof resubmitted with the supporting documentation and information requested by the pharmacy benefit manager shall be paid within twenty (20) days after receipt. (4)  If the board finds that any pharmacy benefit manager, agent or other party responsible for reimbursement for prescription drugs and other products and supplies has not paid ninety-five percent (95%) of clean claims as defined in subsection (3) of this section received from all pharmacies in a calendar quarter, he shall be subject to administrative penalty of not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) to be assessed by the State Board of Pharmacy. (a)  Examinations to determine compliance with this subsection may be conducted by the board.  The board may contract with qualified impartial outside sources to assist in examinations to determine compliance.  The expenses of any such examinations shall be paid by the pharmacy benefit manager examined. (b)  Nothing in the provisions of this section shall require a pharmacy benefit manager to pay claims that are not covered under the terms of a contract or policy of accident and sickness insurance or prepaid coverage. (c)  If the claim is not denied for valid and proper reasons by the end of the applicable time period prescribed in this provision, the pharmacy benefit manager must pay the pharmacy (where the claim is owed to the pharmacy) or the patient (where the claim is owed to a patient) interest on accrued benefits at the rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) per month accruing from the day after payment was due on the amount of the benefits that remain unpaid until the claim is finally settled or adjudicated.  Whenever interest due pursuant to this provision is less than One Dollar ($1.00), such amount shall be credited to the account of the person or entity to whom such amount is owed. (d)  Any pharmacy benefit manager and a pharmacy may enter into an express written agreement containing timely claim payment provisions which differ from, but are at least as stringent as, the provisions set forth under subsection (3) of this section, and in such case, the provisions of the written agreement shall govern the timely payment of claims by the pharmacy benefit manager to the pharmacy.  If the express written agreement is silent as to any interest penalty where claims are not paid in accordance with the agreement, the interest penalty provision of subsection (4)(c) of this section shall apply. (e)  The State Board of Pharmacy may adopt rules and regulations necessary to ensure compliance with this subsection. (5)  (a)  For purposes of this subsection (5), "network pharmacy" means a licensed pharmacy in this state that has a contract with a pharmacy benefit manager to provide covered drugs at a negotiated reimbursement rate.  A network pharmacy or pharmacist may decline to provide a brand name drug, multisource generic drug, or service, if the network pharmacy or pharmacist is paid less than that network pharmacy's acquisition cost for the product.  If the network pharmacy or pharmacist declines to provide such drug or service, the pharmacy or pharmacist shall provide the customer with adequate information as to where the prescription for the drug or service may be filled. (b)  The State Board of Pharmacy shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and ensure compliance with this subsection, including, but not limited to, rules and regulations that address access to pharmacy services in rural or underserved areas in cases where a network pharmacy or pharmacist declines to provide a drug or service under paragraph (a) of this subsection.  The board shall promulgate the rules and regulations required by this paragraph (b) not later than October 1, 2016. (6)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall not directly or indirectly retroactively deny or reduce a claim or aggregate of claims after the claim or aggregate of claims has been adjudicated. SECTION 4.  Section 73-21-156, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-156.  (1)  As used in this section, the following terms shall be defined as provided in this subsection: (a)  "Maximum allowable cost list" means a listing of drugs or other methodology used by a pharmacy benefit manager, directly or indirectly, setting the maximum allowable payment to a pharmacy or pharmacist for a generic drug, brand-name drug, biologic product or other prescription drug.  The term "maximum allowable cost list" includes without limitation: (i)  Average acquisition cost, including national average drug acquisition cost; (ii)  Average manufacturer price; (iii)  Average wholesale price; (iv)  Brand effective rate or generic effective rate; (v)  Discount indexing; (vi)  Federal upper limits; (vii)  Wholesale acquisition cost; and (viii)  Any other term that a pharmacy benefit manager or a health care insurer may use to establish reimbursement rates to a pharmacist or pharmacy for pharmacist services. (b)  "Pharmacy acquisition cost" means the amount that a pharmaceutical wholesaler charges for a pharmaceutical product as listed on the pharmacy's billing invoice. (2)  Before a pharmacy benefit manager places or continues a particular drug on a maximum allowable cost list, the drug: (a)  If the drug is a generic equivalent drug product as defined in Section 73-21-73, shall be listed as therapeutically equivalent and pharmaceutically equivalent "A" or "B" rated in the United States Food and Drug Administration's most recent version of the "Orange Book" or "Green Book" or have an NR or NA rating by Medi-Span, Gold Standard, or a similar rating by a nationally recognized reference approved by the board; (b)  Shall be available for purchase by each pharmacy in the state from national or regional wholesalers operating in Mississippi; and (c)  Shall not be obsolete. (3)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall: (a)  Provide access to its maximum allowable cost list to each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list; (b)  Update its maximum allowable cost list on a timely basis, but in no event longer than three (3) calendar days; and (c)  Provide a process for each pharmacy subject to the maximum allowable cost list to receive prompt notification of an update to the maximum allowable cost list. (4)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall: (a)  Provide a reasonable administrative appeal procedure to allow pharmacies to challenge * * * a maximum allowable cost list and reimbursements made * * * under a maximum allowable cost list for a specific drug or drugs as: (i)  Not meeting the requirements of this section; or (ii)  Being below the pharmacy acquisition cost. (b)  The reasonable administrative appeal procedure shall include the following: (i)  A * * * dedicated direct telephone number, email address and website for the purpose of submitting administrative appeals; (ii)  The website of the pharmacy benefit manager shall include easily accessible administrative appeal instructions, including listing any required information to be submitted by pharmacies for the purpose of submitting administrative appeals ( * * *iiiii)  The ability to submit an administrative appeal or a claim appeal report for multiple claims directly to the pharmacy benefit manager * * * regarding the pharmacy benefit management plan or through a pharmacy service administrative organization; and ( * * *iiiiv)  A period of no less than thirty (30) business days to file an administrative appeal. (c)  The pharmacy benefit manager shall respond to the challenge under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4) within thirty (30) * * * business days after receipt of the challenge. (d)  If a challenge is made under paragraph (a) of this subsection (4), the pharmacy benefit manager shall within thirty (30) * * * business days after receipt of the challenge either: (i) * * *  If  Uphold the appeal * * * is upheld:     1.  Make the change in the maximum allowable cost list payment to at least the pharmacy acquisition cost; 2. Permit the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist to reverse and rebill the claim in question; 3. Provide the National Drug Code that the increase or change is based on to the pharmacy or pharmacist; and 4. Make the change under item 1 of this subparagraph (i) effective for each similarly situated pharmacy as defined by the payor subject to the maximum allowable cost list; or and adjust the reimbursement paid to the pharmacist or pharmacy to no less than the pharmacy acquisition cost, as documented on the pharmacist's and pharmacy's billing invoice, or as provided in the claim appeal report, and make the adjustment effective for that pharmacist or pharmacy for the appeal.  The pharmacy benefit manager shall provide notice on its website that an appeal was made and upheld and that an adjusted reimbursement was made to a pharmacy or pharmacist following the appeal.  The notice shall include the National Drug Code, the day of service for which the appeal was made and the challenged rate; (ii) * * *  If the appeal is denied,  Deny the appeal and provide the challenging pharmacy or pharmacist the National Drug Code and the name of the national or regional pharmaceutical wholesalers operating in Mississippi that the pharmacy or pharmacist is able to purchase prescription drugs for resale from and that have the drug currently in stock at a price below the maximum allowable cost as listed on the maximum allowable cost list; or (iii)  If the National Drug Code provided by the pharmacy benefit manager is not available below the pharmacy acquisition cost from the pharmaceutical wholesaler from whom the pharmacy or pharmacist purchases the majority of prescription drugs for resale, then the pharmacy benefit manager shall adjust the maximum allowable cost as listed on the maximum allowable cost list above the challenging pharmacy's pharmacy acquisition cost and permit the pharmacy to reverse and rebill each claim affected by the inability to procure the drug at a cost that is equal to or less than the previously challenged maximum allowable cost. (e)  The board may adopt rules and regulations necessary to ensure compliance with this subsection. (5)  A pharmacy or pharmacist that belongs to a PSAO shall be provided a true and correct copy of any contract and contract amendment that the PSAO enters into with a pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payer on the pharmacy or pharmacist's behalf. (6)  A pharmacy benefit manager shall not deny an appeal submitted pursuant to subsection (4) of this section based upon an existing contract with the pharmacy that provides for a reimbursement rate lower than the pharmacy acquisition cost. SECTION 5.  Section 73-21-157, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-157.  (1)  Before beginning to do business as a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO, a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall obtain a license to do business from the board.  To obtain a license, the applicant shall submit an application to the board on a form to be prescribed by the board.  This license shall be renewed annually. (2)  When applying for a license or renewal of a license, each pharmacy benefit manager * * * providing pharmacy management benefit plans in this state or PSAO shall file * * * a statement with the board * * * the following:  annually by March 1 or within sixty (60) days of the end of its fiscal year if not a calendar year.  The statement shall be verified by at least two (2) principal officers and shall cover the preceding calendar year or the immediately preceding fiscal year of the pharmacy benefit manager. (3) The statement shall be on forms prescribed by the board and shall include: (a)  A copy of a certified audit report, if the pharmacy benefit manager has been audited by a certified public accountant within the last twenty-four (24) months; or ( * * *ab)  If the pharmacy benefit manager has not been audited in the last twenty-four (24) months, a financial statement of the organization, including its balance sheet and income statement for the preceding year which shall be verified by at least two (2) principal officers; and ( * * *bc)  Any other information relating to the operations of the pharmacy benefit manager required by the board * * * under this section. ( * * *43)  (a)  Any information required to be submitted to the board pursuant to licensure application that is considered proprietary by a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall be marked as confidential when submitted to the board.  All such information shall not be subject to the provisions of the federal Freedom of Information Act or the Mississippi Public Records Act and shall not be released by the board unless subject to an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.  The board shall destroy or delete or cause to be destroyed or deleted all such information thirty (30) days after the board determines that the information is no longer necessary or useful. (b)  Any person who knowingly releases, causes to be released or assists in the release of any such information shall be subject to a monetary penalty imposed by the board in an amount not exceeding Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) per violation.  When the board is considering the imposition of any penalty under this paragraph (b), it shall follow the same policies and procedures provided for the imposition of other sanctions in the Pharmacy Practice Act.  Any penalty collected under this paragraph (b) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board and used to support the operations of the board relating to the regulation of pharmacy benefit managers. (c)  All employees of the board who have access to the information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall be fingerprinted, and the board shall submit a set of fingerprints for each employee to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of conducting a criminal history records check.  If no disqualifying record is identified at the state level, the Department of Public Safety shall forward the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history records check. ( * * *54) * * *  If the pharmacy benefit manager is audited annually by an independent certified public accountant, a copy of the certified audit report shall be filed annually with the board by June 30 or within thirty (30) days of the report being final. (6) The board may extend the time prescribed for any pharmacy benefit manager for filing annual statements or other reports or exhibits of any kind for good cause shown.  However, the board shall not extend the time for filing annual statements beyond sixty (60) days after the time prescribed by subsection (1) of this section.  The board may waive the requirements for filing financial information for the pharmacy benefit manager if an affiliate of the pharmacy benefit manager is already required to file such information under current law with the Commissioner of Insurance and allow the pharmacy benefit manager to file a copy of documents containing such information with the board in lieu of the statement required by this section. ( * * *75)  The expense of administering this section shall be assessed annually by the board against all pharmacy benefit managers and PSAOs operating in this state. ( * * *86)  A pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO or third-party payor * * * may shall not require pharmacy accreditation standards or * * * recertification certification requirements inconsistent with, more stringent than, or in addition to federal and state requirements for licensure as a pharmacy in this state. SECTION 6.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-158, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-158.  (1)  No pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO, carrier or health benefit plan may, either directly or through an intermediary, agent or affiliate engage in, facilitate or enter into a contract with another person involving spread pricing in this state. (2)  A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO contract with a carrier or health benefit plan entered into, renewed or amended on or after the effective date of this act must: (a)  Specify all forms of revenue, including pharmacy benefit management or PSAO fees, to be paid by the carrier or health benefit plan to the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO; and (b)  Acknowledge that spread pricing is not permitted in accordance with this section. (3)  Subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall not apply to self-insured plans. (4)  Every pharmacy benefit manager and PSAO shall disclose to the plan sponsor or employer one hundred percent (100%) of all rebates and other payments that the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO receives directly or indirectly from pharmaceutical manufacturers and/or rebate aggregators in connection with claims administered on behalf of the plan sponsor or employer and the recipients of such rebates. In addition, a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall report annually to each plan sponsor or employer the aggregate amount of all rebates and other payments and the recipients of such rebates unless the contract with the plan sponsor or employer or the health benefit plan already requires these disclosures. (5)  A pharmacy benefit manager or third-party payer shall not charge or cause a patient to pay an amount that exceeds the total amount retained by the pharmacy. SECTION 7.  A pharmacy benefit manager shall not reimburse, compensate or otherwise provide financial consideration to a pharmacy benefit manager affiliated at a higher rate than a non affiliated pharmacy for the same drug and the same pharmacy service solely on the basis of common ownership, control or corporate affiliation. The reimbursement amount for purposes of this section shall be evaluated on a per-unit basis using the same brand or generic product identifier or National Drug Code and the same pharmacy service. Designation of a pharmacy as a specialty pharmacy, or differential reimbursement associated with specialty pharmacy services, shall be based on objective, clinically appropriate and operational criteria related to patient care, safety, service capabilities or regulatory requirements, and shall not be based solely on ownership or corporate affiliation. A pharmacy that meets the disclosed participation criteria applicable to a pharmacy network, including any specialty pharmacy requirements, shall be eligible to participate in that network on the same terms and conditions as a similarly situated affiliated pharmacy. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a pharmacy benefit manager or health benefit plan from encouraging, incentivizing or steering utilization to a pharmacy based on cost-effectiveness, delivery method, service model, performance metrics or volume-based arrangements, provided such criteria are applied uniformly to affiliated and non-affiliated pharmacies. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit bona fide volume-based discounts, rebates or other price concessions offered on equal terms to all similarly situated in-network pharmacies, including affiliated and non-affiliated pharmacies. SECTION 8.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-162, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-162.  (1) Retaliation is prohibited. (a)  A pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or a PSAO shall not retaliate against a pharmacist or pharmacy based on the pharmacist's or pharmacy's exercise of any right or remedy under this chapter.  Retaliation prohibited by this section includes, but is not limited to: (i)  termination or refusing to renew a contract with the pharmacist or pharmacy; (ii)  Subjecting the pharmacist or pharmacy to an increase frequency of audits, numbers of claims audited or amount of monies for claims audited; or (iii)  Failing to promptly pay the pharmacist or pharmacy any money owed by the pharmacy benefit manager to the pharmacist or pharmacy. (b)  For the purposes of this section, a pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO is not considered to have retaliated against a pharmacy if the pharmacy benefit manager: (i)  Takes an action in response to a credible allegation of fraud against the pharmacist or pharmacy; and (ii)  Provides reasonable notice to the pharmacist or pharmacy of the allegation of fraud and the basis of the allegation before initiating an action. (2)  A pharmacy benefit manager, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO shall not penalize or retaliate against a pharmacist, pharmacy or pharmacy employee for exercising any rights under this chapter, initiating any judicial or regulatory actions or discussing or disclosing information pertaining to an agreement with a pharmacy benefit manager or a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate when testifying or otherwise appearing before any governmental agency, legislative member or body or any judicial authority. SECTION 9.  Section 73-21-163, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-21-163.  (1)  Whenever the board has reason to believe that a pharmacy benefit manager * * * or, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO is using, has used, or is about to use any method, act or practice prohibited in * * * Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act and that proceedings would be in the public interest, it may bring an action in the name of the board against the pharmacy benefit manager * * * or, pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO to restrain by temporary or permanent injunction the use of such method, act or practice.  The action shall be brought in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  The court is authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent violations of * * * Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act and such injunctions shall be issued without bond. (2)  The board may impose a monetary penalty on a pharmacy benefit manager * * * or, a pharmacy benefit manager affiliate or PSAO for noncompliance with the provisions of * * * the Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act, in amounts of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per violation and not more than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per violation.  Each day a violation continues for the same brand or generic product identifier or brand or generic code number is a separate violation.  Each day that a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO does business in this state without a license is deemed a separate violation.  The board shall prepare a record entered upon its minutes that states the basic facts upon which the monetary penalty was imposed.  Any penalty collected under this subsection (2) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board. (3)  For the purposed of conduction investigations, the board, through its executive director, may conduct audits and examinations of a pharmacy benefit manger or PSAO and may also issue subpoenas to any pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO or have documents or records that it deems relevant to the investigation. ( * * *34)  The board may assess a monetary penalty for those reasonable costs that are expended by the board in the investigation and conduct of a proceeding if the board imposes a monetary penalty under subsection (2) of this section.  A monetary penalty assessed and levied under this section shall be paid to the board by the licensee, registrant or permit holder upon the expiration of the period allowed for appeal of those penalties under Section 73-21-101, or may be paid sooner if the licensee, registrant or permit holder elects.  Any penalty collected by the board under this subsection ( * * *34) shall be deposited into the special fund of the board. ( * * *45)  When payment of a monetary penalty assessed and levied by the board against a licensee, registrant or permit holder in accordance with this section is not paid by the licensee, registrant or permit holder when due under this section, the board shall have the power to institute and maintain proceedings in its name for enforcement of payment in the chancery court of the county and judicial district of residence of the licensee, registrant or permit holder, or if the licensee, registrant or permit holder is a nonresident of the State of Mississippi, in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.  When those proceedings are instituted, the board shall certify the record of its proceedings, together with all documents and evidence, to the chancery court and the matter shall be heard in due course by the court, which shall review the record and make its determination thereon in accordance with the provisions of Section 73-21-101.  The hearing on the matter may, in the discretion of the chancellor, be tried in vacation. (6)  (a)  The board may conduct audits to ensure compliance with the provisions of this act.  In conducting audits, the board is empowered to request production of documents pertaining to compliance with the provisions of this act, and documents so requested shall be produced within thirty (30) days of the request unless extended by the board or its duly authorized staff. (b)  If, after the conclusion of the audit, the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO was found to be in compliance with all of the requirements of this act, then the board shall pay the costs of the audit.  However, the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO being audited shall pay all costs of such audit if such audit reveals any noncompliance with this act.  The cost of the audit examination shall be deposited into the special fund and shall be used by the board, upon appropriation of the Legislature, to support the operations of the board relating to the regulation of pharmacy benefit managers. (c)  The board is authorized to hire independent consultants to conduct audits of a pharmacy benefit manager and expend funds collected under this section to pay the cost of performing audit services. ( * * *57)  The board shall develop and implement a uniform penalty policy that sets the minimum and maximum penalty for any given violation of * * * Sections 73‑21‑151 through 73‑21‑163 this act.  The board shall adhere to its uniform penalty policy except in those cases where the board specifically finds, by majority vote, that a penalty in excess of, or less than, the uniform penalty is appropriate.  That vote shall be reflected in the minutes of the board and shall not be imposed unless it appears as having been adopted by the board. SECTION 10.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-165, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-165.  (1)  Each drug manufacturer shall submit a report to the board no later than the fifteenth day of January, April, July and October with the current wholesale acquisition cost information for the prescription drugs sold in or into the state by that drug manufacturer; provided, however, the first report due under this subsection shall not be due until October 1, 2026. (2)  Not more than thirty (30) days after an increase in wholesale acquisition cost of forty percent (40%) or greater over the preceding five (5) calendar years or ten percent (10%) or greater in the preceding twelve (12) months for a prescription drug with a wholesale acquisition cost of Seventy Dollars ($70.00) or more for a manufacturer-packaged drug container, a drug manufacturer shall submit a report to the board. The report must contain the following information: (a)  The name of the drug; (b)  Whether the drug is a brand name or a generic; (c)  The effective date of the change in wholesale acquisition cost; (d)  Aggregate, company-level research and development costs for the previous calendar year; (e)  Aggregate rebate amounts paid to each pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO for the previous calendar year; (f)  The name of each of the drug manufacturer's drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration in the previous five (5) calendar years; (g)  The name of each of the drug manufacturer's drugs that lost patent exclusivity in the United States in the previous five (5) calendar years; and (h)  A concise statement of rationale regarding the factor or factors that caused the increase in the wholesale acquisition cost, such as raw ingredient shortage or increase in pharmacy benefit manager's or PSAO's rebates. (3)  A manufacturer's obligations under this section shall be fully satisfied by the submission of any information and data that a manufacturer includes in the manufacturer's annual consolidated report on Securities and Exchange Form 10-K or any other public disclosure.  A drug manufacturer shall notify the board in writing if the drug manufacturer is introducing a new prescription drug to market at a wholesale acquisition cost that exceeds the threshold set for a specialty drug under the Medicare Part D Program. (4)  The notice must include a concise statement of rationale regarding the factor or factors that caused the new drug to exceed the Medicare Part D Program price.  The drug manufacturer shall provide the written notice within three (3) calendar days following the release of the drug in the commercial market.  A drug manufacturer may make the notification pending approval by the United States Food and Drug Administration if commercial availability is expected within three (3) calendar days following the approval. (5)  On or before October 1st of each year, a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO providing services for a health care plan shall file a report with the board.  The report must contain the following information for the previous state fiscal year: (a)  The aggregated rebates, fees, price protection payments, and any other payments collected from each drug manufacturer; (b)  The aggregated dollar amount of rebates, price protection payments, fees and any other payments collected from each drug manufacturer which were passed to health insurers; (c)  The aggregated fees, price concessions, penalties, effective rates, and any other financial incentive collected from pharmacies which were passed to enrollees at the point of sale; (d)  The aggregated dollar amount of rebates, price protection payments, fees, and any other payments collected from drug manufacturers which were retained as revenue by the pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO; and (e)  The aggregated rebates passed on to employers. (6)  Reports submitted by pharmacy benefit managers and PSAOs under this section may not disclose the identity of a specific health benefit plan or enrollee, the identity of a drug manufacturer, the prices charged for specific drugs or classes of drugs, or the amount of any rebates or fees provided for specific drugs or classes of drugs. (7)  On or before October 1st of each year, each health insurer shall submit a report to the board.  The report must contain the following information for the previous two (2) calendar years: (a)  Names of the twenty-five (25) most frequently prescribed drugs across all plans; (b)  Names of the twenty-five (25) prescription drugs dispensed with the highest dollar spent in terms of gross revenue; (c)  Percent of increase in annual net spending for prescription drugs across all plans; (d)  Percent of increase in premiums which is attributable to prescription drugs across all plans; (e)  Percentage of specialty drugs with utilization management requirements across all plans; and (f)  Premium reductions attributable to specialty drug utilization management. (8)  A report submitted by a health insurer may not disclose the identity of a specific health benefit plan or the prices charged for specific prescription drugs or classes of prescription drugs. SECTION 11.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-167, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-167.  (1)  The board shall develop a website to publish information the board receives under this chapter.  The board shall make the website available on the board's website with a dedicated link prominently displayed on the home page, or by a separate, easily identifiable internet address. (2)  Within sixty (60) days of receipt of reported information under this chapter, the board shall publish the reported information on the website developed under this section.  The information the board publishes may not disclose or tend to disclose trade secrets, proprietary, commercial, financial or confidential information of any pharmacy, pharmacy benefit manager, PSAO, drug wholesaler or hospital. (3)  The board may adopt rules to implement this chapter.  The board shall develop forms that must be used for reporting required under this chapter.  The board may contract for services to implement this chapter. (4)  A report received by the board shall not be subject to the provisions of the federal Freedom of Information Act or the Mississippi Public Records Act and shall not be released by the board unless subject to an order from a court of competent jurisdiction.  The board shall destroy or delete or cause to be destroyed or deleted all such information thirty (30) days after the board determines that the information is no longer necessary or useful. (5)  This section shall stand repealed on June 30, 2028. SECTION 12.  The following shall be codified as Section 73-21-169, Mississippi Code of 1972: 73-21-169.  (1) Pharmacy benefit managers and PSAOs shall also identify to the board any ownership affiliation of any kind with any pharmacy which, either directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries: (a)  Has an investment or ownership interest in a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO holding a certificate of authority; (b)  Shares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO holding a certificate of authority in this state; or (c)  Has an investor or a holder of an ownership interest which is a pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO holding a certificate of authority issued in this state. (2)  A pharmacy benefit manager or PSAO shall report any change in information required by this act to the board in writing within sixty (60) days after the change occurs. SECTION 13. (1)  There is hereby created the Mississippi Independent Pharmacist Reimbursement Assistance Grant Program ("the program"), which shall be administered by the Mississippi Board of Pharmacy.  The purpose of the program is to provide financial assistance to independent community pharmacies located in Mississippi that experience sustained reimbursement pressures, increased operational costs, or other economic challenges that threaten continued access to pharmacy services in underserved areas. (2)  For purposes of this section: (a)  "Independent pharmacy" means a pharmacy licensed by the Mississippi Board of Pharmacy that is privately owned, has fewer than five (5) locations under common ownership, and is not owned, controlled or affiliated with a pharmacy benefit manager, health insurer, chain pharmacy or publicly traded corporation. (b)  "Eligible costs" include, but are not limited to, reimbursement shortfalls, staffing expenses, technology upgrades, patient care services, workflow modernization, rural delivery expansion, inventory carrying costs and other expenses approved by the board. (c) "Board" means the Mississippi Board of Pharmacy. (3)  An independent pharmacy may apply for reimbursement assistance under this section if it: (a)  Maintains active licensure in good standing with the board; (b)  Has operated in Mississippi for at least twelve (12) consecutive months prior to application; (c)  Demonstrates financial hardship or reimbursement inadequacy through documentation required by the board; and (d)  Provides pharmacy services to Medicaid beneficiaries, Medicare beneficiaries or patients in rural or medically underserved areas, as defined by the board. (4)  Grant awards shall be subject to available funding.  The board may award grants on an annual basis. Each eligible pharmacy may receive up to an amount established annually by the board, based on available appropriations.  Grants may be prorated among eligible applicants if requests exceed available funds.  Grant funds shall not be used to replace or duplicate funding provided by federal programs or private settlements, but may supplement such funds. (5)  The board shall establish an application process, required documentation, timelines and evaluation standards.  The board shall consider factors such as financial hardship, geographic access needs, patient volume and the availability of pharmacy services in the applicant's community.  The board may require reporting on how grant funds are used and may audit recipients to ensure compliance. (6)  The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement and administer the program, including application criteria, award methodologies, documentation requirements, allowable uses, reporting obligations and enforcement provisions. (7)  The program shall be funded through annual appropriations of the Legislature, grants, donations or other funds made available to the board for this purpose.  Grant funds shall be deposited into a special fund created in the State Treasury, known as the Independent Pharmacist Reimbursement Assistance Fund, which shall be used solely for administering and awarding grants under this section.  The fund shall be subject to appropriation by the Legislature. (8)  The board shall submit an annual report to the Chairmen of the Senate and House Public Health Committees, detailing program participation, geographic distribution of awards, financial data, and the impact of the program on pharmacy access in Mississippi. SECTION 14. (1)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to impose a fiduciary duty on a pharmacy benefit manager or health insurer that is inconsistent with federal law. (2)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit a health benefit plan or plan sponsor from designing or administering formularies, benefit tiers, pharmacy networks, utilization management programs, or cost-sharing arrangements for the purpose of controlling costs and improving clinical outcomes, provided such designs comply with applicable state and federal law. (3)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to require a health benefit plan or plan sponsor to include all willing pharmacies in a preferred or limited network; however, a pharmacy that is willing and able to meet the disclosed reimbursement terms, cost-sharing arrangements, delivery capabilities, and clinically appropriate service or specialty standards applicable to such network shall not be excluded solely on the basis of ownership status or corporate affiliation. (4)  Differences in scale, geographic coverage, delivery models, pricing structures, and clinical capabilities may affect a pharmacy's ability to meet network participation standards, and differences do not constitute unlawful discrimination. SECTION 15.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.